Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4202
Legislative purpose and intent.

It is the purpose and intent of the Legislature to provide access to health insurance coverage at an affordable premium to all residents of Nebraska, including those individuals denied coverage due to a preexisting medical condition or whose policy includes a restrictive rider limiting coverage for such a condition. The purpose of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act is to provide a mechanism to ensure the availability of health insurance coverage to individuals unable to purchase such coverage for a preexisting medical condition either on an individual or group basis directly from an insurer. It is the intent of the Legislature that adequate levels of health insurance coverage be made available to residents of Nebraska who are otherwise considered uninsurable or who are underinsured due to a medical condition creating a high risk. It is the intent of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act to provide affordable insurance for individuals with such medical conditions by making such health insurance coverage available.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 2.